Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB663.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. Deaf and Hard of Hearing Education.--(a) In accordance with the academic standards for health, safety and physical education and not later than the beginning of the 2025-2026 school year, the department, in consultation with the Department of Health and at least one State or local organization with an expertise in hearing impairment and loss, shall identify or develop a model curriculum and curriculum guidelines for instruction on deaf and hard of hearing education for public school students.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) The model curriculum and guidelines shall:(1) be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website;(2) be age-appropriate;(3) be revised regularly to remain current with national standards;(4) provide guidance for integration into health courses or other appropriate curriculum requirements;(5) be made available to all school entities; and(6) address topics, including:(i) hearing loss types and causes;(ii) the prevalence of hearing impairment and loss;(iii) common sources of noises that can contribute to hearing loss;(iv) effects of noise on hearing and warning signs of impairment;(v) types of assistive devices available to address or offset hearing loss;(vi) hearing loss stigmas and prevention techniques;(vii) the impact hearing impairment and loss can have on an individual; and(viii) recommendations on preventing and treating hearing loss.(c) (1) A school entity that offers instruction in deaf and hard of hearing education may utilize the model curriculum developed under subsections (a) and (b) or develop the school entity's own curriculum in accordance with academic standards and consistent with guidelines developed under subsections (a) and (b). A school entity may utilize appropriate publicly or privately available materials, personnel and other resources in 20250SB0663PN0687 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 developing and implementing this instruction, subject to the requirements of section 111 and 23 Pa.C.S. § 6344 (relating to employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents).(2) A teacher, instructor or community volunteer, with the participation of a professional educator with a Pennsylvania certification, including a professional educator certified in physical education or health education or a school nurse, may provide, facilitate or oversee the instruction offered by a school entity under this section.(d) A cyber charter school may provide the instruction under this section through the Internet or other electronic means. If a cyber charter school provides the instruction under this section through the Internet or other electronic means, the cyber charter school shall be exempt from the academic standards and guidelines developed under subsections (a) and (b) regarding in-person instructional requirements.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0663PN0687 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526